Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 7 Custody and Probate of Wills

33-7-1 — 33-7-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 781-784; G.L. 1909, ch. 310, §§ 1-4; G.L. 1923, ch. 361, §§ 1-4; G.L. 1938, ch. 572, §§ 1-4; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; P.L. 1977, ch. 246, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 324, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2008, ch. 306, § 1, effective December 31, 2008.

33-7-5.
Duty of person in possession of will to deliver into court.

Every person, other than a probate clerk, who has custody of a will shall, within thirty (30) days after notice of the death of the testator, deliver the will into the probate court which has jurisdiction of the probate thereof, or to the executors named in the will, who shall themselves deliver it into court within thirty (30) days after they receive the will; and if any executor or other person neglects, without reasonable cause, to deliver a will, after being duly cited for that purpose by the court, he or she may be adjudged to be in contempt and may be committed therefor to the adult correctional institutions and shall remain there until he or she delivers the will to the court; and he or she shall be further liable, to any party aggrieved, for the damage sustained by reason of the neglect.

Provided further, that a fiduciary nominated in a will may deliver such will to the probate court with an affidavit containing the following information, representations, and documentation:

The date of death of the decedent accompanied by a certified copy of the decedent’s death certificate;

A representative that the funeral bill of the decedent has been paid, accompanied by a receipt therefor;

The names and addresses of the heirs-at-law of the decedent at the decedent’s date of death; and

A representation that the affiant has received no notice of the issuance of letters testamentary or letters of administration regarding the estate of the decedent, and that there are no assets of the decedent subject to probate. Upon receipt of such will and affidavit the probate clerk, upon being paid a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), shall receive and keep the will and accompanying affidavit and shall give a receipt of the deposit thereof.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 785; G.L. 1909, ch. 310, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 361, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 572, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-5

; P.L. 1998, ch. 448, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 5.

33-7-6.
Investigation of alleged concealment of will.

Upon complaint under oath, made to a probate court, by a person claiming to be interested in the estate of a person deceased against any one suspected of retaining, concealing, or conspiring with others to retain or conceal a will or testamentary instrument of the deceased, the court may cite the suspected person to appear before it and be examined under oath about the complaint. Upon examination, all interrogatories and answers shall be in writing, signed by the party examined, and shall be filed in the court. If the person cited refuses to appear and submit to examination, or to answer the interrogatories that are lawfully propounded to him or her, or to obey any lawful order of the court, he or she may be adjudged to be in contempt and may be committed to the adult correctional institutions, there to remain until he or she submits to the order of court. On the complaint, the court may, in its discretion, award costs to be paid by either party, and may issue execution therefor.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 786; G.L. 1909, ch. 310, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 361, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 572, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-6

.

33-7-7.
Penalty for theft, destruction, or concealment of will.

Any person who shall either during the life of the testator or after his or her death steal or for any fraudulent purpose destroy or conceal any will or other testamentary instrument, either before or after probate, shall be imprisoned in the adult correctional institutions for a term of not more than five (5) years, and in any complaint, information, or indictment for the offense it shall not be necessary to allege that the will, codicil, or other instrument is the property of any person or that it is of any value.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 789; G.L. 1909, ch. 310, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 361, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 572, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-7

.

33-7-7.1.
Disposition of documents intended as last wills and testaments in the possession of the probate courts.

The several city and town probate courts within the state are hereby authorized and directed to return all documents in their possession intended as last wills and testaments and accepted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter as follows:

A notice, by certified mail, shall be sent to each testator, and/or person designated to receive the will upon death, including the drafting attorney, if known, at the last known address of each, indicating that the probate courts are no longer required to maintain custody of such documents and that the documents are available for return upon execution of the appropriate receipt.

The probate courts shall not be required to retain further possession of such documents for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months following the issuance of the certified mail notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 306, § 2.

33-7-8.
Proof of will of nonresident.

The will, duly executed, of any person who resides outside the state at the time of his or her death, may be proved before the probate court of any town where any property is situated upon which the will may operate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 788; G.L. 1909, ch. 310, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 361, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 572, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-8

.

33-7-9.
Notice to executors of petition for probate.

If any of the executors named in a will are not parties to a petition for probate, the clerk of the probate court, upon probate of the will, shall forthwith notify by mail the executors who are not parties and whose post office addresses are known or can be ascertained.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 816; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-9

.

33-7-10.
Proof of wills when subscribing witnesses unavailable.

Whenever it shall appear to a probate court, before which a purported will has been presented for probate, and whenever it shall appear to the superior court, before which a petition for probate of a will is pending on appeal, that a will cannot be proven as otherwise provided by law because one or more of the subscribing witnesses to the will, at the time the will is offered for probate, are serving in or present with the armed forces of the United States, or serving as merchant sailors, or are dead, or mentally or physically incapable of testifying, or otherwise are unavailable in the course of their service, the court may admit the will to probate upon the testimony in person or by deposition of at least two (2) credible disinterested witnesses that the signature to the will is in the handwriting of the person whose will it purports to be, or upon other sufficient proof of the handwriting. The foregoing provision shall not preclude the court, in its discretion, from requiring in addition, the testimony in person, or by deposition, of any available subscribing witness, or proof of such other important facts and circumstances as the court may deem necessary to admit the will to probate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1420, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-10

.

33-7-11.
Provisions of § 33-7-10 supplemental.

The provisions of §

33-7-10

, and the authority therein granted, shall be deemed to be supplemental to, and not in derogation of, the authority of the probate court and the superior court to act upon petitions for the probating of wills.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1420, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-11

.

33-7-12.
Compromise of controversies pending probate.

The superior court may authorize the persons named as executors in an instrument purporting to be the last will of a deceased person, or the administrator with the will annexed, at any time before a final decree approving the instrument as the last will of the deceased person is entered, to adjust by compromise all controversies that may exist or arise concerning the will.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 832; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-12

.

33-7-13.
Action to confirm compromise.

When the executors or administrators with the will annexed have in writing compromised any controversy as provided in §

33-7-12

, they, or any party thereto, may file a civil action in the superior court for the county in which the will is pending for probate, praying the court to authorize and confirm the compromise. In this action the persons named as executors, or the administrator with the will annexed, and all persons claiming under the will whose interest will, in the opinion of the court, be affected by the proposed compromise, and those entitled to the estate as intestate, shall be parties.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 833; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-13

.

33-7-14.
Representation of parties under disability.

If a person under legal disability is a necessary party to a civil action, he or she shall be represented by his or her guardian, or by a guardian ad litem appointed by the court, who shall, in the name and in behalf of the party he or she represents, make and receive all proper conveyances and payments necessary to carry into effect any compromise sanctioned by the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 834; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-14

.

33-7-15.
Representation of contingent interests and charitable gifts.

If it shall appear to the court that any future contingent interests which would arise under the will, if admitted to probate, would be affected by the compromise, the court shall appoint some suitable person or persons to represent those interests in the proceedings. The court shall have like powers as to any gifts made in the will for charitable purposes if there is no trustee who can act.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 835; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-15

.

33-7-16.
Decree confirming compromise.

The compromise, if found by the court under the circumstances to be just and reasonable in relation to the parties in being, and in its effect upon any future contingent interests that might arise under the will, and to any gifts to charities made in the will, shall be confirmed by decree of the court and shall be valid and binding upon the contingent interests and gifts as well as upon the interests of all persons in being who are parties to the compromise.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 836; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-16

.

33-7-17.
Certification of decree and compromise.

If the probate of the will in a case is pending on appeal in the superior court, the court may prove and allow the will, and the clerk of court shall certify and transmit for record copies of the decree admitting the will to probate, and copies of the compromise and the decree of the court approving the compromise, to the clerk of the court appealed from; and if the probate of the will is pending in the probate court, the clerk of the superior court shall certify and transmit for record to the clerk of the probate court copies of the compromise and the decree approving the compromise; and thereupon the probate court may admit the will to probate. The estate of the deceased person shall be administered and disposed of according to the provisions of the will as modified by the compromise.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 837; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-17

.

33-7-18.
Request to record foreign probated will.

Whenever the executor or any other person interested in any will, which has been finally proved and allowed in a probate court in any territory, district, or state of the United States, or in a probate court in any foreign country, shall produce a copy of the will and of the will’s probate, duly authenticated according to an act of congress, to any probate court in any town or city in this state where the testator had property, real or personal, upon which the will may operate, and shall in writing request that the will may be filed and recorded in the office of the probate clerk in that town or city, the court shall assign a time and place for a hearing.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 790; G.L. 1909, ch. 310, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 361, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 572, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-18

.

33-7-19.
Notice of offer of foreign will.

Upon the request to record a foreign probated will, the court shall cause notice thereof to be given in the same manner as if the will was presented to the court for probate, so that any person may appear and show cause why the copy should not be filed and recorded.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 791; G.L. 1909, ch. 310, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 361, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 572, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-19

.

33-7-20.
Order approving foreign will — Effect on real estate titles.

If, at the hearing, no sufficient cause is shown to the contrary, the court may order the copy to be placed on file and recorded; provided, however, that, as to real estate in towns other than that in which the copy is filed and recorded, the title shall not pass, for the purposes of conveyance by the devisee, until a certified copy is recorded in the records of land evidence in any other town or city in which any real estate is situated; and provided, further, that when any copy is duly filed and recorded as aforesaid, title to lands devised by the will shall relate back to the death of the testator.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 792; G.L. 1909, ch. 310, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 361, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 572, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-20

.

33-7-21.
Effect of recording of foreign will — Granting of letters.

Whenever a copy of any will which has been finally proved and allowed in any probate court in any territory, district, or state of the United States, or in any foreign country, shall be finally ordered to be filed and recorded in a probate court in this state pursuant to §§

33-7-18

to

33-7-20

, the filing and recording of the will shall be of the same force and effect as if the will had been originally proved and allowed in this state, subject to the provisos in §

33-7-20

; and the probate court in which the copy of the foreign will is ordered to be filed and recorded may grant letters testamentary to the named executor, or letters of administration with the will annexed to a person as the court may deem fit, taking bond from the executor or person as in case of a will proved and allowed in the probate court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 793; G.L. 1909, ch. 310, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 361, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 572, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-21

.

33-7-22.
Proof of foreign will not required to be probated in domicile.

A person interested in a will which is operative without probate by the laws of the state or country where the testator had his or her domicile at the time of his or her death may produce to the probate court of any town in this state in which there is any property, real or personal, on which the will may operate, a copy of the will and of the official record, duly authenticated according to act of congress, and the court shall assign a time and place for a hearing and cause notice to be given as in the case of a will offered for probate. If at such hearing the court finds, from the copies before it and any additional proof as to the authenticity and execution of the will, that the instrument ought to be allowed in this state as the last will of the deceased, it shall order the copy to be filed and recorded, and the will shall then have the same effect as if it had been originally proved and allowed in this state.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 794; G.L. 1909, ch. 310, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 361, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 572, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-22

.

33-7-23.
Probate conclusive as to execution.

The final probate of a will by the probate court, or on appeal, shall be conclusive as to its due execution.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 787; G.L. 1909, ch. 310, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 361, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 572, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-23

.

33-7-24.
Taking of will from files of court — Copy retained — Proof of copy on loss of original.

The probate court in which an original will has been duly proved, allowed, and recorded may, after the expiration of the time within which an appeal may be taken from the decree admitting the will to probate, upon the petition of the executor, or of a legatee named in the will, or of any person interested in the estate of the testator, and after any notice the court may require and a hearing thereon, permit the original will, if it appears to be necessary for the purpose, to be taken from the files of the court and to be used in another state, territory, district or foreign country, for the purpose of establishing the right or title of the executor, legatee or person to the estate of the testator in the other state, territory, district or foreign country, upon the terms and conditions as the court may prescribe. Likewise, before probate, an instrument purporting to be a last will may be annexed to a commission for taking depositions in proof of the same, in this or any other state, territory, district or foreign country; a photographic copy of the instrument, duly certified, being retained on the files of the court. From any order of the court granting permission, for annexing a will to a commission as provided above, no appeal shall lie. In case the original will is lost, on proof of loss, the copy may be proved in the same manner and shall have the same effect as the original.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 795; G.L. 1909, ch. 310, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 361, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 572, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

33-7-24

.

33-7-25.
Original probate of foreign wills.

The will of a nondomiciliary which upon probate may operate upon any property in the state and which is executed in the same manner as is prescribed for the execution of wills of Rhode Island residents under the laws of this state may be admitted to original probate in any probate court of this state in the same manner as any other will.

A will which has been admitted to probate or established in the testator’s domicile shall not later be admitted to original probate in this state except:

In a case where the court is satisfied that ancillary probate would be unduly expensive, inconvenient, or impossible under the circumstances;

Where the testator has directed in the will that it shall be offered for probate in this state; or

Where the laws of the testator’s domicile discriminate against domiciliaries of this state either as a beneficiary or as a fiduciary.

A will which by judgment or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction in the testator’s domicile has been denied probate or establishment shall not be admitted in this state except where denial of probate or establishment is solely for a cause which is not grounds for rejection of a will of a testator domiciled in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 151, § 1.

33-7-26.
Proof of purported will or codicil.

In the absence of objection by anyone interested in the estate of a deceased person, the probate court may admit to probate a purported will or codicil of the deceased person upon oral testimony or affidavit in the following manner:

The oral testimony of any one of the subscribing witnesses as to the due execution of any purported will or codicil shall constitute sufficient evidence thereof.

An affidavit by the subscribing witnesses or any one or more of them, to any purported will or codicil, executed at any time after execution of the will or codicil, whether before or after the death of the testator, before any officer authorized to administer oaths in or out of this state, stating the facts as the witnesses or witness would be required to testify to in court to prove the will or codicil, shall constitute sufficient evidence of the due execution of the purported will or codicil.

An affidavit substantially in the form that follows shall be deemed to meet the requirements of subdivision (2) of this section:

STATE OF COUNTY OF In on this day of , 20 , before me personally appeared the undersigned, who, being duly sworn, depose and say that: they witnessed the execution of the will (codicil) of ; that the signature to the will (codicil) is in the handwriting of the testator or was made by some other person for the testator, in the testator's presence and by the testator's express direction; that the testator so subscribed the will (codicil) and declared the same to be his last will (a codicil to his last will) in their presence; that they thereafter subscribed the same as witnesses in the presence of the testator and in the presence of each other; that at the time of execution of the will (codicil) the testator appeared to be of sound mind and eighteen (18) years of age or over; and that the signatures of the witnesses on the will are genuine. Subscribed and sworn to before me on the day and date first above written, Notary public

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 133, § 1.